District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Friends of Wangari Gardens Grant Temporary Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 3(c) of the Department of Transportation Establishment Act of 2022,
effective May 21, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-137; D.C. Official Code § 50-921.02(c)) is amended by
adding a new paragraph (5) to read as follows:
“(5) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Director may issue a grant to
the Friends of Wangari Gardens for the purpose of assessing, designing, and installing a water
meter and potable water source directly on the Wangari Gardens property with a spigot for
gardeners’ free use.”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2